Wisconsin, session 2025, AB203.
do enact as follows:AB203,11Section 1. 86.52 of the statutes is created to read:AB203,2,3286.52 Limiting liability for manufacturers of traffic control devices. 3(1) Definitions. In this section:AB203,2,94(a) “Traffic control device” means any sign, signal, marking, channelizing 5device, or other device that uses color, shape, symbols, words, sound, or tactile 6information for the primary purpose of communicating a regulatory, warning, or 7guidance message to users of a highway, bicycle way, as defined in s. 340.01 (5s), 8sidewalk, as defined in s. 340.01 (58), or pedestrian way, as defined in s. 346.02 (8) 9(a).AB203,2,1310(b) “Traffic control devices manual” means the manual establishing a uniform 11system of traffic control devices adopted by the department under s. 84.02 (4) (e) or 12the manual establishing a uniform system of signs, signals, markings and devices 13for bicycle traffic adopted by the department under s. 84.02 (4) (f).AB203,2,1814(2) Limitation of liability. (a) A manufacturer, distributor, seller, installer, 15or owner of a traffic control device is not liable for damages arising from the design, 16manufacture, distribution, or installation of a traffic control device that complies 17with the specifications for the device established in the traffic control devices 18manual and operates as intended.AB203,3,219(b) The limitation of liability under par. (a) applies to any claim for personal 1injury, property damage, or other loss arising out of the use of a traffic control 2device, including claims of negligence, strict liability, and breach of warranty.AB203,3,73(c) The limitation of liability under par. (a) does not apply if the claimant 4establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the traffic control device to which 5the damages are attributable did not, at the time that the damages occurred, 6comply with the specifications for the device established in the traffic control 7devices manual or operate as intended.AB203,3,128(3) Presumption of compliance. In any action alleging liability against a 9manufacturer, distributor, seller, installer, or owner of a traffic control device, there 10is a rebuttable presumption that the traffic control device complied with the 11specifications established in the traffic control devices manual if the manufacturer, 12distributor, seller, installer, or owner can demonstrate all of the following:AB203,3,1513(a) The traffic control device was designed, manufactured, distributed, and 14installed in accordance with the applicable standards and guidelines established in 15the traffic control devices manual.AB203,3,1816(b) Any deviations from the specifications established in the traffic control 17devices manual were expressly authorized in writing by the department or the 18appropriate local authorities.AB203,3,1919